Washington statutes.
RCW 36.49.070

Penalty.

Any person or officer who refuses to comply with or enforce any of the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.49.070. Prior: 1929 c 198 s 9; RRS s 8304-6.]